Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5183.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 305. (1) If the An employee is must not receive compensation under this act if the employee's employer establishes that the employee was injured by reason because of his the employee's intentional, serious, and wilful willful misconduct. , he shall not receive compensation under the provisions of this act. (2) As used in this section, "serious" means, when used with respect to misconduct, objectively egregious and reprehensible conduct that is harmful to an employee and others.